Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska35-1010
Rules and regulations.

The State Fire Marshal may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations necessary to carry out the Firefighter Cancer Benefits Act.

Laws 2021, LB432, § 9.